Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327C.11, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Writ of recovery stayed. The issuance of a writ of recoverydeleted text begin , other than a conditional writ,deleted text end shall be stayed for deleted text begin a reasonable period not to exceed sevendeleted text end new text begin 90new text end days to allow the resident to arrange to remove the resident's home from the lotnew text begin or for the purpose of an in park sale, as provided in section 327C.07. The resident must be permitted to remain in the home for ten days following issuance of the writ. The resident has 28 days following the issuance of the writ to remove personal property under the process outlined in section 504B.365, subdivision 3. The writ must also direct the park owner to notify any party holding a security interest in the resident's home and known to the park owner of the provisions of the writ within 15 daysnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327C.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Summons and complaint; additional notice. new text end new text begin In addition to the information in the summons required under section 504B.321, subdivision 4, a park owner taking an eviction action under this section must include the following verbatim notice: "If you sign over title to your home or the park owner otherwise takes title to your home and then sells the home, you have the right under Minnesota law (Minnesota Statutes, section 327C.11, subdivision 5) to the return of any money except what you owe in back rent, utility charges, any liens on your home, and other lawful costs and fees. To receive any money left over from the sale, you must provide the park owner with an address, telephone number, or email address where you can be contacted after you leave the park. The park owner must pay you within 30 days after they receive this information from you." new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327C.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Acquisition and sale of resident's home by park owner; surplus. new text end new text begin If a park owner acquires title to the resident's home under section 168A.142, 168A.143, 504B.265, or 504B.271, and subsequently sells the home, the proceeds of that sale must first be applied in the following order: new text end new text begin (1) to any outstanding balance the former resident owed to the park for rent, utilities, and actual costs incurred by the park; and new text end new text begin (2) to any liens on the property. new text end new text begin A park owner must return any remaining surplus to the former resident within 30 days of the resident providing an address, telephone number, or email address where the former resident can be reached after vacating the park. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 327C.11, subdivision 4, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08207 327C.11 EVICTION PROCEEDINGS. Subd. 4. Conditional writ. Where the interests of justice require the court may issue a conditional writ of recovery, which orders the resident and all those in the resident's household to stop residing in the park within a reasonable period not to exceed seven days, but which allows the resident's home to remain on the lot for 60 days for the purpose of an in park sale, as provided in section 327C.07. The writ shall also direct the park owner to notify any party holding a security interest in the resident's home and known to the park owner, of the provisions of the writ. If the court issues a conditional writ, the resident may keep the home on the lot for 60 days for an in park sale if: (1) neither the resident nor members of the resident's household reside in the park; (2) the resident complies with all rules relating to home and lot maintenance; and (3) the resident pays on time all rent and utility charges owed to the park owner. If the resident fails to meet any of these conditions, the park owner may, on three days' written notice to the resident, move the court for an order making the writ of recovery unconditional. Sixty-one days after the issuance of a conditional writ, the writ shall become absolute without further court action.